West Virginia, session 2025, HB2539.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. PARKS AND RECREATION. §20-5-25.  Discount to West Virginia residents. The director shall provide to West Virginia citizens who document residency by valid West Virginia driver's license or identification card a 25 percent reduction in fees for lodging and services used exclusively by the citizen.